Arkansas, session 2025, HB1354.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-92-503, concerning definitions used
under the Arkansas Pharmacy Benefits Manager Licensure Act, is amended to add
additional subdivisions to read as follows:
(16) "Medicaid" means the state-federal medical assistance
program established by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396
et seq.;
(17) "Pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid" means a person
that is engaged in manufacturing, preparing, propagating, compounding,
processing, packaging, repackaging, or labeling of a prescription drug that
is eligible in the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program or agrees to participate in
the Medicaid Drug Rebate Program to pay a rebate to states for prescription
*ANS197*
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
drugs covered by Medicaid;
(18)(A) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" means a standardized agreement entered into by a pharmacy
benefits manager and a network of pharmacies across the United States where a
pharmacy is, either directly or indirectly, passed through a pharmacy
services administrative organization messenger model to agree to certain
pricing terms and conditions for a patient if that pharmacy is managed or
represented by a pharmacy benefits manager network.
(B) "Pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies" includes a nationwide network of pharmacies that have entered
into a contract for national reimbursement rates, terms and conditions that
are not Arkansas specific with a pharmacy benefits manager to provide
pharmacist services including without limitation dispensing medications to a
patient within the pharmacy benefits manager network;
(19)(A) "Professional dispensing fee" means a fee approved by
the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services for the fee-for-service Arkansas
Medicaid Program for preferred brand drugs and generic drugs.
(B) "Professional dispensing fee" includes without
limitation:
(i) Pharmacy costs and expenses related to a
pharmacist's:
(a) Time spent checking a computer for
information about an individual's coverage for health or pharmacy benefits;
(b) Performing prescription drug utilization
review and preferred prescription drug list review activities;
(c) Measurement or mixing of a covered
outpatient prescription drug;
(d) Filling a container with a prescription
drug;
(e) Beneficiary counseling;
(f) Physically providing a completed
prescription drug to a patient;
(g) Delivery of a completed prescription drug;
and
(h) Special packaging of a completed
prescription drug; and
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
(ii) Overhead costs associated with maintaining a
facility and equipment necessary to operate a pharmacy;
(20) "Publicly traded company" means an entity that is publicly
traded on a nationally recognized stock exchange; and
(21) "State government and public plan sponsor" means an
employer sponsor of a health benefit plan for employees that is established
or maintained by:
(A) The Arkansas Municipal League;
(B) The Employee Benefits Division;
(C) A public two-year or four-year institution of higher
education, including a community college or technical college;
(D) The Division of Arkansas State Police;
(E) A municipality;
(F) A county; or
(G) Any other plan or program that is directly or
indirectly funded by a state appropriation to furnish, cover the cost of, or
otherwise provide for pharmacist services to an individual who resides in or
is employed in this state.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 92, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add additional sections to read as follows:
23-92-512. Prohibited practices for contracts involving state
government and public plan sponsors — Contract requirements.
(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a state government and public plan
sponsor that offers, issues, or renews a health benefit plan in this state
shall not enter into a contract with a pharmacy benefits manager if that
pharmacy benefits manager utilizes a pharmacy benefits manager national
contract to pharmacies either directly or indirectly with a pharmacist or a
pharmacy for pharmacist services through a pharmacy services administrative
organization.
(b) If a pharmacy benefits manager contracts with a state government
and public plan sponsor, the pharmacy benefits manager shall not:
(1) Use a pharmacy benefits manager national contract to
pharmacies that may otherwise have rates, compensation, terms, and conditions
that do not comply with Arkansas law;
(2) Pay a pharmacy or pharmacist who also has a direct or
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
indirect interest or ownership in a publicly traded company a higher
dispensing fee or ingredient cost compared to an Arkansas pharmacy that does
not have a direct or indirect interest or ownership in a publicly traded
company;
(3) Utilize contract terms that provide no choice for a pharmacy
or pharmacist or offer an adhesion contract that violates the bulletins or
rules issued by the Insurance Commissioner;
(4) Charge a fee, percentage, or service charge to manage a
prescription drug manufacturer coupon, copay accumulator, or copay maximizer
program that is more expensive than a similar program offered by the
Evidence-Based Prescription Drug Program of the College of Pharmacy of the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences;
(5) Charge or collect a fee from a percentage of a prescription
drug manufacturer coupon;
(6)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(6)(B) of this
section, directly or indirectly reimburse a pharmacy or pharmacist for a drug
or medication dispensed to a covered person an amount less than:
(i) The national average drug acquisition cost on
the day of the claim administration or, if unavailable, the wholesale
acquisition cost on the day of the claim administration for the ingredient
drug product component of pharmacist services;
(ii) An amount equal to five percent (5%) of the
amount determined according to subdivision (b)(6)(A)(i) of this section or
two hundred fifty dollars ($250), whichever is less; or
(iii) A professional dispensing fee that is not less
than the professional dispensing fee paid by the Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(B) A pharmacist or pharmacy contracted with a pharmacy
benefits manager for pharmacist services may submit and charge a lower amount
than the requirements of the pharmacy benefits manager allowable or minimum
in this subdivision (b)(6) by voluntarily using or setting the pharmacist's
or pharmacy's usual and customary charges at a competitive market rate where
the pharmacist or pharmacy competes with other pharmacists or pharmacies to
more efficiently serve patients at an efficient, fair, and safe price point
to provide pharmacist services.
(C) This subdivision (b)(6) does not prevent a pharmacy or
pharmacist from charging a delivery fee or shipping and handling fee for
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
pharmacy services that are required or requested by a patient;
(7) Prohibit a pharmacist or pharmacy from mailing prescription
drugs to patients;
(8) Prohibit a pharmacist or a pharmacy from charging an
additional shipping fee, care coordination fee, or handling cash fee if the
patient requests the prescription drug to be mailed or delivered or prior
authorization coordination help with the prescriber and pharmacy benefits
manager is requested by the patient and needed for pharmacist services by a
pharmacist or pharmacy; or
(9) Contract with a pharmacy benefits manager to negotiate
rebates under this subchapter or rebates as defined under § 23-79-2502 from
the manufacturer either directly or indirectly through a group purchasing
organization or other middleman entity directly or indirectly affiliated with
a pharmacy benefits manager and located in the United States or in another
country.
(c)(1) The contracted rates allowable under this subchapter shall be
Arkansas-specific to ensure that the contracted rates comply with this
subchapter.
(2) A statement in a contract that the pharmacy benefits manager
will comply with Arkansas law is not sufficient to satisfy subdivision (c)(1)
of this section unless the contract has Arkansas-specific negotiated
compensation terms that are negotiated and contain specific explanations as
to how the contract complies with Arkansas law.
(3) The execution of a contract under this section may be
negotiated with a pharmacy or pharmacist or signed by a pharmacy services
administrative organization.
(d)(1) Any amount of savings from a prescription drug manufacturer
coupon shall be passed through to either the patient or the state government
and public plan sponsor.
(2) A fee or charge shall be negotiated separately in a
transparent manner without consideration of the savings allowed or achieved
by a prescription drug manufacturer coupon.
(e) A state government and public plan sponsor shall:
(1) Calculate a beneficiary's cost share or deductible based
solely on the ingredient cost of a prescription drug; and
(2) Be prohibited from passing along the cost of the
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
professional dispensing fee to a beneficiary through a cost share,
deductible, or any other out-of-pocket payment by the beneficiary.
(f)(1) The commissioner shall require a pharmacy benefits manager to
disclose any instance or contract term in which a pharmacy that is affiliated
with the pharmacy benefits manager that has any direct or indirect interest
in, or is owned by the pharmacy benefits manager, has been paid more in real
processed claims, on dispensing fees, on ingredient costs, or for pharmacist
services than any pharmacy or pharmacist that is located in Arkansas in the
last three (3) years for individual claims.
(2) A limited examination or audit shall be conducted by the
State Insurance Department, and the results shall be shared with:
(A) Arkansas Legislative Audit;
(B) The House Committee on Insurance and Commerce; and
(C) The Senate Committee on Insurance and Commerce.
(3) A pharmacy benefits manager who was contracted as the
pharmacy benefits manager for a state government and public plan sponsor that
either negotiated and contracted a higher payment rate for a pharmacy with a
direct or indirect interest in a pharmacy benefits manager, that paid higher
dispensing fees, professional dispensing fees or ingredient costs to a
pharmacy with direct or indirect interest with a pharmacy benefits manager,
or that paid a pharmacy benefits manager affiliate pharmacy at rates that
violated § 17-92-101 et seq. within the last three (3) years, is not eligible
to bid on or continue to serve as a pharmacy benefits manager in a contract
for at least three (3) years from January 1, 2026.
(4) The request for proposal process for state government and
public plan sponsor pharmacy benefits manager claims processing and services
contract shall be open to all Arkansas-licensed pharmacy benefits managers
that comply with these requirements.

23-92-513. Pharmaceutical manufacturers for Medicaid.
(a) A pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid shall pay a state
government and public plan sponsor rebates as defined under this subchapter
and § 23-79-2502 or those rebates and negotiated supplemental rebates as
defined in the Arkansas Medicaid Program at rates and discounts that are
equal to or greater than those required by Medicaid drug rebates and those
supplemental rebates negotiated by the Arkansas Medicaid Program based on
02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197

As Engrossed: H2/27/25 HB1354
prescription drug claims paid for pharmacist services by a pharmacy and a
pharmacist by a state government and public plan sponsor through a pharmacy
benefits manager.
(b) A pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid shall pay these rebates
to a state government and public plan sponsor or the pharmaceutical
manufacturers for Medicaid's prescription drugs will not be eligible for
payment or coverage by a state government and public plan sponsor.
(c)(1) If patient harm would occur or unreasonable financial harm
would occur to a pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid that prevents the
pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid from participating, the
pharmaceutical manufacturer for Medicaid may appeal to the Insurance
Commissioner and Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy to:
(A) Avoid paying rebates; or
(B) Petition for a reduction in rebate paid to a state
government and public plan sponsors.
(2) The commissioner, in consultation with the board, may
approve or deny the appeal under subdivision (c)(1) of this section.

/s/Lundstrum

















02-27-2025 10:57:16 ANS197